Utah statutes.
58-60-203.   Board.
(1)  There is created the Social Worker Licensing Board consisting of two
certified social workers, two clinical social workers, two social service
workers, and one member from the general public.
(2)  The board shall be appointed, serve terms, and be compensated in
accordance with Section 58-1-201.
(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board are under Sections 58-1-202
and 58-1-203.  In addition, the board shall:
(a)  designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to assist
the division in review of complaints concerning unlawful or unprofessional
practice by a licensee in any profession regulated by the board and to advise
the division regarding the conduct of investigations of the complaints; and
(b)  disqualify any member from acting as presiding officer in any
administrative procedure in which that member has previously reviewed the
complaint or advised the division.
